Idaho, session 2025, H0232.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 36-402, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
36-402. LICENSES -- AUTHORITY -- LIMITATIONS -- CONFIDENTIALITY --
MARKETING. (1) The licenses mentioned in this chapter shall entitle the
person to whom issued to take such wildlife as may be authorized by said li-
cense, subject to the limitations set forth under this title and commission
regulations promulgated pursuant thereto. Except as otherwise provided by
law relating to the release of information to a governmental entity or law
enforcement agency, any personal information including, but not limited
to, names, personal and business addresses and phone numbers, sex, height,
weight, date of birth, social security and driver's license numbers, or any
other identifying numbers and/or information related to any Idaho fish and
game licenses, permits and tags shall be confidential and not subject to dis-
closure pursuant to the provisions of chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code, unless
written consent is obtained from the affected person.
(2) The department shall provide an opt-in method for deer and elk tag
applicants to consent, pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, to mar-
keting of services by outfitters licensed pursuant to chapter 21, title 36,
Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 4, Title 36, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 36-408A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:


36-408A. DEER AND ELK TAGS LIMITED FOR NONRESIDENTS -- SALE OF TAGS TO
RESIDENTS AT NONRESIDENT PRICES. (1) It is the intent of the legislature to
improve deer and elk hunting opportunities for residents by limiting non-
resident participation with a net neutral effect to the substantial revenue
that has historically been collected by the department from sales of deer and
elk tags and licenses that are priced higher for nonresidents than for resi-
dents.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Capped hunt" means a hunt framework for which the commission has
set a limit on the total number of tags available to residents and non-
residents by game management zone, unit, or other hunt area. Tags in a
capped hunt are available to residents over the counter, without a draw-
ing by lot, and are available to nonresidents either over the counter or
by drawing by lot.
(b) "Controlled hunt" means a hunt framework for which the commission
has set a limit on the total number of tags available to residents and
nonresidents in a drawing by lot by game management zone, unit, or other
hunt area.
(c) "Nonresident-limited/resident-unlimited" means a framework for
which the commission has set a limit on the number of tags available to
nonresidents but has not set a limit on the number of tags available to
residents. Tags in this hunt framework are available to residents over
the counter and are available to nonresidents either over the counter
or by drawing by lot. The commission may set nonresident tag limits
pursuant to this paragraph by game management zone, unit, or other hunt
area that may be divisions of the hunt area in which resident tags may be
used.
(3) Beginning with hunting licenses and deer and elk tags sold for
use in calendar year 2027, not more than ten percent (10%), rounded to the
nearest whole percent, of the total tags for each capped hunt, controlled
hunt, and nonresident-limited/resident-unlimited hunt, pursuant to com-
mission proclamation by game management zone, unit, or other hunt area, may
be available for sale to nonresidents. The commission shall estimate the
total number of tags available to nonresidents for nonresident-limited/res-
ident-unlimited hunts based on historic use.
(4) The provisions of this section shall not apply to:
(a) Tags for which eligibility is based on private landowner's desig-
nation or permission, as authorized by statute, rule, proclamation, or-
der, or other authorization to control depredation;
(b) Tags purchased by lifetime license certificate holders who are no
longer Idaho residents or by persons establishing Idaho residency that
are not yet qualified to purchase a resident license;
(c) Free tags to minor children with life-threatening medical condi-
tions, military veterans with disabilities, or governor's wildlife
partnership tags, each of which may be issued pursuant to section
36-408, Idaho Code; and
(d) Nonresident junior mentored tags.
(5) The commission may set aside annually and reserve for sale to hold-
ers of nonresident disabled veteran licenses nonresident disabled veteran
deer and elk tags at fees provided in section 36-416, Idaho Code, for use in


nonresident-limited/resident-unlimited hunts, not to exceed five hundred
(500) tags for deer and three hundred (300) tags for elk. Such nonresident
disabled veteran tags shall be excluded from the provisions of this section.
Holders of nonresident disabled veteran licenses shall be eligible to pur-
chase deer and elk tags at the regular nonresident tag fees provided in sec-
tion 36-416, Idaho Code, and subject to regular nonresident limits.
(6) For capped hunts in which tags were available for sale to nonresi-
dents directly and via allocation of nonresident tags to outfitted hunters
in excess of ten percent (10%) of total tags prior to January 1, 2027, the
commission may authorize a number of tags, not more than the number of tags
previously available in excess of ten percent (10%), for sale to residents as
a first tag at the nonresident tag prices provided in section 36-416, Idaho
Code, with total tag numbers for the hunt to remain within the limits set by
the commission.
(7) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, if the respective
statewide quota set by the commission for nonresident deer or elk tags has
not been met by July 31, the commission may authorize the sale of tags at the
nonresident tag fee provided in section 36-416, Idaho Code, as follows:
(a) To nonresidents as first or second tags for capped hunts if the to-
tal tag limit set by the commission for the hunt has not been met or for
nonresident-limited/resident-unlimited if the nonresident limit has
not been met; and
(b) To residents as second tags for use in the same manner as a resident
tag in a capped hunt if the total tag limit set by the commission has not
been met or in a nonresident-limited/resident-unlimited hunt.
(8) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, in controlled
hunts with fewer than ten (10) total tags available, a single tag may be
available for drawing by nonresidents.
(9) The commission is authorized to promulgate rules, subject to leg-
islative approval, necessary to implement the provisions of this section.
The commission may prescribe whether sales to nonresidents for capped hunts
and nonresident-limited/resident-unlimited hunts are over the counter or by
drawing by lot, subject to controlled hunt application fees as provided in
section 36-416, Idaho Code.
(10) Upon a finding by the commission that sales of hunting licenses and
deer and elk tags pursuant to this section are generating less revenue than
was generated previously by nonresident participation at levels above ten
percent (10%) and that department operations are negatively impacted, the
commission is authorized, for tag sales for calendar year 2029 or later, to
issue an order to restore a level of nonresident participation to not more
than the statewide nonresident tag quotas set by rule. The commission shall
give notice of any such order to the director of the legislative services of-
fice for review by the germane joint subcommittee as soon as possible after
adoption by the commission.
SECTION 3. That Section 36-408, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
36-408. COMMISSION'S AUTHORITY -- TAGS -- PERMITS -- NONRESIDENTS
LIMITED -- OUTFITTERS SET-ASIDE. (1) Tags and Permits -- Method of Use. The
commission is hereby authorized to prescribe the number and kind of wildlife


that may be taken under authority of the several types of tags and permits
provided for in this title and the manner in which said tags and permits shall
be used and validated. All Idaho wolf tags will be valid for hunting, trap-
ping, and snaring in any unit when seasons are open at the time of take. There
shall be no limit to the number of wolf tags that an individual can purchase.
All appropriate fish and game education requirements must be met.
(2) Limit -- Licenses, Tags or Permits -- Controlled Hunts. The commis-
sion is hereby authorized to establish a limit annually as to the number of
each kind and class of licenses, tags, or permits to be sold or issued and is
further authorized to limit the number or prohibit entirely the participa-
tion by nonresidents in controlled hunts.
(3) Outfitted Hunter Tags Set-Aside. When the commission establishes a
limit as to the number of nonresident deer tags and nonresident elk tags, it
shall set aside, when setting big game seasons, in a statewide pool, a maxi-
mum of twenty-five percent (25%) of the nonresident deer tag and nonresident
elk tag limit. These tags may be allocated to the outfitted hunters in capped
hunts and controlled hunts and set aside for outfitted hunter use in general
hunts.
Such outfitted allocated set-aside tags shall be separate from the tag
numbers set for residents and nonresidents in each capped or controlled
hunt, unit, or game management area. The set-aside tags shall be sold pur-
suant to commission rule, only to persons that have entered into a signed
agreement for that year to utilize the services of an outfitter licensed
pursuant to chapter 21, title 36, Idaho Code.
In order for a person to purchase any set-aside nonresident deer tag or
nonresident elk tag, that person's outfitter must submit an application with
the proper fees as required by the director. If any nonresident deer tags or
nonresident elk tags set aside for use in general hunts pursuant to this sub-
section are unsold by July 15 of the year in which they were set aside, they
may be sold by the department to the general public pursuant to commission
rule. If any nonresident deer tags or nonresident elk tags set aside as gen-
eral capped allocated tags pursuant to this subsection are unsold by July 31
of the year in which they were set aside, they may be sold by the department to
the general public pursuant to commission rule.
The commission may promulgate all necessary rules to implement the pro-
visions of this subsection.
(4) Deer and Elk Tag Allocation. When setting big game seasons, if the
commission limits the number of deer or elk tags available for use in any game
management area, unit, or zone, the commission may allocate by rule, where
there are outfitted operations, a number of deer and elk tags from the out-
fitted hunter set-aside pool of tags for use by hunters that have entered
into a signed agreement for that year to utilize the services of an outfit-
ter licensed pursuant to chapter 21, title 36, Idaho Code.
In addition to rules promulgated by the commission regarding allo-
cation, or pursuant to this section, in capped hunts the commission may
allocate the number of outfitted hunter elk and deer tags based on the high-
est number within each of the last two (2) years of all elk or deer tags using
the services of an outfitter in each capped hunt. Any additional tags above
the original outfitted hunter tag quota may come from the nonresident out-
fitted hunter set-aside pool or the nonresident quota in the capped hunt,


not to exceed fifty percent (50%) of the nonresident quota for each capped
hunt. In capped hunts, when tag numbers change for all users, they will apply
proportionally to all user groups.
In controlled hunts, the commission may allocate the number of outfit-
ted hunter elk or deer tags based on a number compiled from each outfitter's
highest year within the last two (2) years of all elk or deer tags using
the services of an outfitter for each controlled hunt. Any additional tags
above the original outfitted hunter tag quota may come from the nonresident
outfitted hunter set-aside pool or the nonresident quota in the controlled
hunt, not to exceed fifty percent (50%) of the nonresident quota for each
controlled hunt.
Outfitted hunter tag use history will be provided through records from
the sale of outfitted hunter tags compiled by the Idaho department of fish
and game and verified use other than allocated tags recorded with the depart-
ment by December 20 by outfitters. The department shall distribute the allo-
cated outfitted tags through its point-of-sale machines.
Beginning December 1, 2020, all outfitted deer and elk tag use shall be
verified in order to qualify for allocated outfitted hunter tag use history.
Verification consists of the purchase of allocated tags from the Idaho de-
partment of fish and game or the use of an outfitter-provided agreement, in-
cluding the tag number that is recorded with the department.
All big game tags used in allocated outfitted hunts must be recorded by
outfitters with the department by December 20 each year. An administrative
fee of five dollars ($5.00) shall be assessed for each allocated outfitted
big game tag sold or exchanged at a point-of-sale machine. An administrative
fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be assessed for each big game tag sub-
mitted for verification as being outfitted.
The allocated tags shall be designated by the Idaho outfitters and
guides licensing board to those authorized outfitting operations licensed
for elk and deer hunting for the use by the outfitted hunter, pursuant to
section 36-2107(h), Idaho Code.
Those tags not qualified for allocated tag use history include emer-
gency depredation, landowner appreciation program hunts, or meat packing
without an outfitted allocated deer or elk tag.
The commission may promulgate all necessary rules to implement the pro-
visions of this subsection.
(5) (3) Special Game Tags. The commission is hereby authorized to issue
two (2) special bighorn sheep tags per year.
(a) Auction bighorn sheep tag. One (1) special bighorn sheep tag shall
be auctioned off by an incorporated nonprofit organization dedicated
to wildlife conservation selected by the commission. The tag shall be
issued by the department of fish and game to the highest eligible bid-
der. No more than five percent (5%) of all proceeds for the tag may be
retained by the organization. The tag to be issued pursuant to this
subsection shall be taken from the nonresident bighorn sheep tag quota.
The net proceeds shall be forwarded to the director for deposit in the
fish and game expendable trust account and shall be used for bighorn
sheep research and management purposes. Moneys raised pursuant to this
subsection may not be used to transplant additional bighorn sheep into
that portion of southwest Idaho south of the Snake river and west of U.S.


highway no. 93, nor for litigation or environmental impact statements
involving bighorn sheep. No transplants of bighorn sheep accomplished
with moneys raised pursuant to this subsection shall occur in any area
until hearings are conducted in the area. Provided however, that none
of the proceeds generated from the auction of bighorn sheep tags pur-
suant to this paragraph be used to purchase or acquire private property
or federally managed grazing permits, nor shall any proceeds generated
be used for matching funds for the purchase of private property or the
retirement or the acquisition of federally managed grazing permits.
(b) Lottery bighorn sheep tag. The commission is also authorized to
issue one (1) special bighorn sheep tag, which will be disposed of by
lottery. The lottery permit can be marketed by the department of fish
and game or a nonprofit organization dedicated to wildlife conservation
selected by the commission. The tag will be issued by the department of
fish and game to an eligible person drawn from the lottery provided in
this subsection. No more than twenty-five percent (25%) of gross rev-
enue can be retained for administrative costs by the organization. All
net proceeds for the tag disposed of by lottery pursuant to this subsec-
tion shall be remitted to the department and deposited in the fish and
game expendable trust account. Moneys in the account from the lottery
bighorn sheep tag shall be utilized by the department in solving prob-
lems between bighorn sheep and domestic sheep, solving problems between
wildlife and domestic animals, or improving relationships between
sportsmen and private landowners.
(6) (4) Issuance of Free Permit or Tag to Minor Children with
Life-Threatening Medical Conditions. Notwithstanding any other provision
of law, the commission may issue free big game permits or tags to minor chil-
dren who have life-threatening medical conditions that have been certified
eligible by a qualified organization. The commission may prescribe by rule
the manner and conditions of issuing and using the permits or tags authorized
under this subsection. For purposes of this subsection, a "qualified or-
ganization" means a nonprofit organization that is qualified under section
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that affords opportunities and
experiences to minor children with life-threatening medical conditions.
(7) (5) Issuance of Free Permit or Tag to Military Veterans with Dis-
abilities. The commission may prescribe by rule the manner and conditions of
using the permits or tags authorized under this subsection. Notwithstand-
ing any other provision of law, the commission shall issue five (5) free big
game permits or tags to disabled military veterans whose disability has been
certified eligible by the Idaho division of veterans services. All veterans
applying must be sponsored by a "qualified organization," which for purposes
of this subsection means a governmental agency that assists veterans or a
nonprofit organization that is qualified under section 501(c)(3), 501(c)(4)
or 501(c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code and that affords opportunities,
experiences and assistance to disabled veterans. The Idaho division of vet-
erans services shall screen all applicants to ensure only the most deserving
disabled veterans shall be issued these permits or tags. A list of screened
applicants shall be provided to the commission in priority order for is-
suance. The commission shall issue one (1) permit or tag each to the top two
(2) candidates for a sponsored hunt as designated by the Idaho division of


veterans services and the three (3) remaining permits or tags to candidates
sponsored by a qualified organization as described in this subsection.
(8) (6) Special Wolf Tags. The commission is hereby authorized to issue
up to ten (10) special auction or lottery tags for hunting wolves. Special
wolf tags will be auctioned off or made available through lottery by incor-
porated nonprofit organizations dedicated to wildlife conservation and se-
lected by the director. No more than five percent (5%) of all proceeds for
each tag may be retained by the nonprofit organization for administrative
costs involved. Each wolf tag shall be issued by the department of fish and
game and awarded to the highest eligible bidder or winner of a lottery. Each
tag will be good for the harvest of one (1) wolf pursuant to commission rule.
The proceeds from each tag will be sent to the director to be placed in the de-
partment general license fund.
(9) (7) Special Big Game Auction Tags -- Governor's Wildlife Part-
nership Tags. The commission is hereby authorized to issue special big
game auction tags hereafter named and referred to as "Governor's wildlife
partnership tags" for hunting designated species on dates and in areas
designated by the commission. To enhance and sustain the value of Idaho's
wildlife, up to three (3) tags per species per year may be issued for deer,
elk and pronghorn antelope, one (1) tag per year may be issued for moose,
and one (1) tag per species per year may be issued for mountain goat and
bighorn sheep. Each tag will be signed by the governor of Idaho prior to
auction to the public and be available to either residents or nonresidents of
Idaho. Governor's wildlife partnership tags issued for deer, elk, pronghorn
antelope and moose pursuant to this subsection shall be taken from the non-
resident controlled hunt programs for these species adopted by the fish and
game commission. Governor's wildlife partnership tags issued for mountain
goat and bighorn sheep shall be taken from the nonresident mountain goat and
bighorn sheep quota. Governor's wildlife partnership tags shall be auc-
tioned off by incorporated nonprofit organizations dedicated to wildlife
conservation and selected by the director. No more than five percent (5%) of
all proceeds from each tag sale may be retained by the nonprofit organization
for administrative costs involved, including in the event a tag is redonated
and reauctioned. Each tag shall be issued by the department of fish and game
and awarded to the highest eligible bidder. Each tag shall be good for the
harvest of one (1) big game animal pursuant to commission rule consistent
with the provisions of this subsection. The proceeds from each tag shall be
sent to the director to be allocated up to thirty percent (30%) for sportsmen
access programs, such as access yes, and the balance for wildlife habitat
projects, wildlife management projects to increase the quantity and quality
of big game herds, and other research and management activities approved by
the commission. Provided however, that none of the proceeds generated from
the auctions pursuant to the provisions of this subsection shall be used to
purchase or acquire private property or federally managed grazing permits,
nor shall any proceeds generated be used for matching funds for the purchase
of private property or the retirement or the acquisition of federally man-
aged grazing permits. Moneys raised pursuant to this subsection may not be
used to transplant additional bighorn sheep into that portion of southwest
Idaho south of the Snake river and west of U.S. highway no. 93, nor for liti-
gation or environmental impact statements involving bighorn sheep.


SECTION 4. That Section 36-401, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
36-401. HUNTING, TRAPPING, FISHING -- LICENSE REQUIREMENT -- EXCEP-
TIONS. No person shall hunt, trap, or fish for or take any wild animal, bird
or fish of this state, without first having procured a license as hereinafter
provided. Provided that no license shall be required:
(a)1. For children under the age of fourteen (14) years who are resi-
dents of this state to fish during the open season therefor.
2. For nonresident children under the age of fourteen (14) years to fish
during the open season therefor provided they are accompanied by the
holder of a valid fishing license, and provided further that any fish
caught by such nonresident children shall be included in the bag and
possession limit of such license holder.
3. For resident children under the age of twelve (12) years to hunt,
take or kill predatory, unprotected birds and animals by means other
than with firearms.
4. For resident children under the age of fourteen (14) years to trap
muskrats from irrigation ditches or property on which they live during
the open season.
5. For children under the age of eighteen (18) years who are residents
of a licensed foster home or a children's residential care facility to
fish during the open season therefor, provided they are accompanied and
supervised by the director, officer, or other employee of the facility
where the child resides.
6. For children with life-threatening medical conditions participat-
ing in a hunt in association with a qualified organization as provided
in section 36-408(6) 36-408(4), Idaho Code.
7. For military veterans with disabilities participating in a hunt
in association with a qualified organization as provided in section
36-408(7) 36-408(5), Idaho Code.
8. For mentored hunters participating in a mentored hunting program as
prescribed by the commission such that a person may apply to the depart-
ment for a special authorization to take wildlife while accompanied by a
mentor who possesses a valid Idaho hunting license and who is eighteen
(18) years of age or older. At such time as a mentored hunter's special
authorization is no longer valid, nothing in this paragraph shall be
construed as altering the requirements of section 36-411, Idaho Code,
to obtain a valid hunting license.
(b) For any person to fish on a "free fishing day" as may be designated
by the commission.
(c) State Long-term Care Facility Residents. For any resident of a
state long-term care facility to fish during open seasons, provided said
state long-term care facility has a permit therefor from the director. The
director is authorized to issue such permits upon the request of the head
of the respective state long-term care facility having custody of said res-
ident upon a showing that the state long-term care facility recommends the
issuance of such permit and will assume full responsibility for and control
over any resident while using said permit. For purposes of this subsection
only, "state long-term care facility" shall mean the state hospital north,


state hospital south, state hospital west, southwest Idaho treatment cen-
ter, and state veterans homes, and "resident" shall mean any individual re-
siding and receiving treatment services at a state long-term care facility.
(d) State Juvenile Corrections Center Students. For students of the
state juvenile corrections center, under the supervision of an officer of
the center, to fish during the open season.
(e) Boy Scouts. For boy scouts who are official participants in at-
tendance at national or international encampments at Farragut State Park to
take fish during the encampment period from Lake Pend Oreille in such areas
and such numbers as may be designated by the commission.
(f) Participants in Fish and Game Sponsored Functions. For persons who
are official participants in attendance at official department sponsored
functions including clinics, courses or other educational events, while
under the supervision of a department approved instructor for the function,
to fish during any open season, provided that the instructor has been issued
an educational fishing permit by the director.
(g) Nothing contained herein shall be construed to prohibit citizens of
the United States who are residents of the state of Idaho from carrying arms
for the protection of life and property.
SECTION 5. That Section 36-409, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
36-409. GAME TAGS -- PERMITS -- FEES -- PENALTY. (a) Resident Game
Tags. A resident who has obtained authorization to hunt, as provided in
section 36-401, Idaho Code, or has purchased or obtained a license to hunt,
as provided in section 36-406, Idaho Code, upon payment of the fees provided
in this chapter shall be eligible to receive a resident game tag to hunt and
kill a moose, bighorn sheep, mountain goat, elk, deer, antelope, mountain
lion, black bear, grizzly bear, wolf, sandhill crane, swan, sage grouse, or
turkey in accordance with the laws of this state and rules promulgated by the
commission; provided further, that any person who holds a senior resident
combination license or any person who holds a junior combination or hunting
license or any disabled American veteran who holds a disabled combination
license may be issued a black bear, deer, elk, or turkey tag for a fee as spec-
ified in section 36-416, Idaho Code; provided further, that resident game
tags may be issued only to those persons who meet residency requirements of
section 36-202(s), Idaho Code. In the event an emergency is declared to open
a season to protect private property as provided in section 36-106(e)6.(B),
Idaho Code, the affected landowner or his designee shall be eligible to re-
ceive a resident deer, elk or antelope tag without charge; provided further,
that resident game tags may be issued only to persons who qualify as resi-
dents pursuant to section 36-202, Idaho Code.
(b) Nonresident Game Tags. A nonresident who has purchased a license to
hunt, as provided in section 36-407(a) or (k), Idaho Code, or has obtained a
license to hunt, as provided in section 36-406(e), Idaho Code, or a resident
who has purchased or obtained a license or authorization to hunt, as provided
in section 36-401 or 36-406, Idaho Code, upon payment of the fees provided in
this chapter, shall be eligible to receive a nonresident tag to hunt and kill
a moose, bighorn sheep, mountain goat, elk, deer, antelope, mountain lion,
black bear, grizzly bear, wolf, sandhill crane, swan, sage grouse, or turkey


in accordance with the laws of this state and rules promulgated by the com-
mission; provided further, that a nonresident who has purchased a license to
hunt, as provided in section 36-407(k) and (l), Idaho Code, shall be eligible
to receive a junior mentored or disabled American veteran deer, elk, black
bear, or turkey tag for a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code.
(c) Game Tags Required. The appropriate tag must be had for the hunt-
ing or taking of each and every one of the aforementioned wildlife. The
commission shall promulgate rules to allow exception from tag possession
to take wildlife for a disabled hunter companion who is assisting a hunter
possessing the appropriate tag and a valid disabled combination license or
a disabled archery permit or a disabled hunt motor vehicle permit or who is
a disabled veteran participating in a hunt as provided in section 36-408(7)
36-408(5), Idaho Code. Provided, that the commission may promulgate rules
to allow a nonresident deer or elk tag to be used to hunt and kill a black
bear, a wolf, or a mountain lion during the open season for deer or elk in that
area, unit or zone as may be specified by the commission. All of said tags are
to bear and have serial numbers.
(d) Game Tag to Be Validated and Attached to Carcass. As soon as any
person kills any wildlife for which a tag is required, said tag, belonging to
him, must be validated and attached to said wildlife in a manner provided by
commission rule.
(e) Archery Permits. In addition to meeting the license and tag re-
quirements provided in this chapter, any person participating in any con-
trolled or general game season that has been specifically designated as an
archery hunt must have in his possession an archery hunt permit, which may be
purchased for a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code.
(f) Muzzleloader Permit. In addition to meeting the license and tag re-
quirements provided in this chapter, any person participating in any con-
trolled or general game season that has been specifically designated as a
muzzleloader hunt must have in his possession a muzzleloader permit, which
may be purchased for a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code.
(g) Hound Hunter Permit -- Resident -- Nonresident. Any person using a
dog for the purpose of hunting or for taking, as defined in section 36-202,
Idaho Code, big game or fur-bearing animals must have in his possession a
valid hound hunter permit, which may be purchased by resident and nonresi-
dent license holders for a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code.
(h) Nonresident Bird of Prey Capture Permit. The commission may, un-
der rules as it may prescribe, issue a nonresident bird of prey capture per-
mit. This capture permit may be purchased by any licensed nonresident fal-
coner for capturing birds of prey in Idaho. The fee for the permit shall be as
specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code, and the permit shall be issued un-
der the condition that the nonresident's home state allows reciprocal raptor
capturing privileges for Idaho falconers.
(i) Upland Game Bird Permit. The commission may, under rules as it may
prescribe, issue an upland game bird permit that must be purchased by all
persons over seventeen (17) years of age prior to hunting stocked upland game
birds on department-owned lands, lands managed under agreement with the de-
partment, and private lands enrolled in a department-sponsored public ac-
cess program with written permission of the land owner landowner. The fee
for the permit shall be as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code.


(j) Black Bear Baiting Permit. The commission may, under rules as it
may prescribe, issue a black bear baiting permit. Any person placing or us-
ing bait as may be allowed by rule for the purpose of attracting a black bear
must have in his possession a valid black bear baiting permit, which may be
purchased by a license holder for a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho
Code.
(k) Migratory Bird Harvest Information Program Permit. The commission
may, as provided by federal laws or regulations and under rules as it may pre-
scribe, issue a migratory bird harvest information program permit that must
be purchased by all persons prior to hunting migratory game birds as required
by federal law or regulations. The fee for the permit shall be as specified
in section 36-416, Idaho Code.
(l) Dog Field Trial Permit. The commission may, under rules as it may
prescribe, issue a dog field trial permit to any person using birds for dog
field trials or training as may be allowed by rule. The permit may be pur-
chased for a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code.
(m) Idaho Nursing Home Facility Resident Fishing Permit. The commis-
sion may, under rules as it may prescribe, issue an Idaho nursing home fa-
cility resident fishing permit that must be purchased by an Idaho nursing
home facility to allow residents of its facility to fish during the open sea-
son. Facilities eligible to purchase this permit are: intermediate care
facilities providing twenty-four (24) hour skilled nursing care, assisted
living facilities providing twenty-four (24) hour extensive assistance, and
skilled nursing facilities providing twenty-four (24) hour skilled nursing.
By purchasing this permit, the facility assumes full responsibility for and
control over the facility residents while using the permit. All laws, rules
and proclamations apply to the use of this permit and it is the responsibil-
ity of the facility to assure compliance with all laws, rules and proclama-
tions. In case of a violation, the facility shall be held accountable and any
citations shall be issued to the facility. The permit may be purchased for a
fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code.
SECTION 6. That Section 36-2107, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
36-2107. POWERS AND DUTIES OF BOARD. (1) The board shall have the fol-
lowing duties and powers:
(a) To conduct examinations to ascertain the qualifications of appli-
cants for outfitter's or guide's licenses, and to issue such licenses to
qualified applicants, with such restrictions and limitations thereon
as the board may find reasonable.
(b) To prescribe and establish rules of procedure to carry into effect
the provisions of this chapter including, but not limited to, rules
prescribing all requisite qualifications of training, experience,
knowledge of rules of governmental bodies, condition and type of gear
and equipment, and examinations to be given applicants, whether oral,
written or demonstrative, or a combination thereof.
(c) To conduct hearings and proceedings to suspend, revoke, or restrict
the licenses of outfitters or guides, and to suspend, revoke, or re-
strict said licenses for due cause in the manner hereinafter provided.


(d) The board is expressly vested with the power and the authority to
To enforce the provisions of this chapter, including obtaining injunc-
tive relief, and to make and enforce any and all reasonable rules which
shall by it be deemed necessary and which that are not in conflict with
the provisions of this chapter, for the express purpose of safeguard-
ing the health, safety, welfare, and freedom from injury or danger of
those persons utilizing the services of outfitters and guides, and for
the conservation of wildlife and range resources.
(e) The board shall have the power to To cooperate with the federal and
state government through its appropriate agency or instrumentality
in matters of mutual concern regarding the business of outfitting and
guiding in Idaho.
(f) The board shall have the power throughout the state of Idaho to To
request the attendance of witnesses and the production of such books,
records, and papers as may be required at any hearing before it. The
board or its hearing officer may issue and serve subpoenas or sub-
poenas duces tecum in a manner consistent with chapter 52, title 67,
Idaho Code, the rules of the office of the attorney general, and rules
45(e)(2) and 45(g) of the Idaho rules of civil procedure. Payment of
fees or mileage for service of subpoenas or attendance of witnesses
shall be paid by the board consistent with the provisions of chapter 52,
title 67, Idaho Code, the rules of the office of the attorney general,
and rule 45(e)(1) of the Idaho rules of civil procedure. Disobedience
of a subpoena or subpoena duces tecum may be enforced by making applica-
tion to the district court. Disobedience by a licensee of a subpoena or
subpoena duces tecum issued by the board shall be deemed a violation of a
board order.
(g) (2) The division administrator shall have the power to hire en-
forcement agents in order to conduct investigations and enforce the provi-
sions of this chapter. All enforcement agents appointed by the board who are
certified by the Idaho peace officer standards and training council shall
have the power of peace officers limited to:
1. (a) Enforcement of the provisions of this chapter.; and
2. (b) Responding to express requests from other law enforcement agen-
cies for aid and assistance in enforcing other laws. For purposes of
this section, such a request from a law enforcement agency shall mean
only a request as to a particular and singular violation or suspicion of
violation of law and shall not constitute a continuous request for as-
sistance outside the purview of enforcement of the provisions of this
chapter.
(h) The board shall designate the number of deer or elk tags allocated
pursuant to section 36-408(4), Idaho Code, among the authorized outfitting
operations within each capped or controlled zone, unit, or game management
area in a fair and equitable manner designed to maximize the use of allocated
tags by the outfitted public and promote predictability for individual out-
fitting operations that have previously used or ensured the use of the allo-
cated tags designated to them. The board will report the number of tags des-
ignated to each outfitter operation back to the department of fish and game
for distribution.


SECTION 7. That Section 36-2116, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
36-2116. COMPLAINT FOR VIOLATION -- PROSECUTION BY COUNTY ATTOR-
NEY. (a) The board or its designated agent may prefer a complaint before any
court of competent jurisdiction in the county where the offense occurred,
for a violation of: (i) the provisions of subsections (1), (2), (7), (8),
or (9) of section 36-2113, Idaho Code; or (ii) any regulation promulgated
pursuant to subsection (d) of section 36-2107(1)(d), Idaho Code.
(b) Any person convicted of any violation enumerated in subsection
(a) of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction
thereof, shall be punished as provided in section 36-2117, Idaho Code. Fifty
percent (50%) of all fines and forfeitures collected shall be paid to the
outfitters and guides licensing board and such moneys so received by the
board shall be deposited with the state treasurer and the state treasurer
shall credit the same to the occupational licenses fund and fifty percent
(50%) of all fines and forfeitures collected shall be distributed in accor-
dance with section 19-4705, Idaho Code.
SECTION 8. That Section 36-2120, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 9. That Section 36-2102, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
36-2102. DEFINITIONS. (a) "Person" includes any individual, firm,
partnership, corporation or other organization or any combination thereof.
(b) "Outfitter" includes any person who, while engaging in the acts
enumerated herein: (1) advertises or otherwise holds himself out to the
public for hire; (2) provides facilities and services for consideration; and
(3) maintains, leases, or otherwise uses equipment or accommodations for
compensation for the conduct of outdoor recreational activities that are
known to involve inherent risk limited to the following: hunting animals
or birds; float or power boating on Idaho lakes, reservoirs, rivers, and
streams; fishing on Idaho lakes, reservoirs, rivers, and streams; and haz-
ardous desert or mountain excursions. Any firm, partnership, corporation or
other organization or combination thereof operating as an outfitter shall
designate one (1) or more individuals as agents who shall, together with
the licensed outfitter, be held responsible for the conduct of the licensed
outfitter's operations and who shall meet all of the qualifications of a
licensed outfitter.
(c) "Guide" is any natural person who is employed by a licensed outfit-
ter to furnish personal services for the conduct of outdoor recreational ac-
tivities directly related to the conduct of activities for which the employ-
ing outfitter is licensed. Any such person not employed by a licensed out-
fitter who offers or provides facilities or services as specified in subsec-
tion (b) of this section shall be deemed in violation of the provisions of
this chapter, except: (1) any employee of the state of Idaho or the United
States when acting in his official capacity, or (2) any natural person who is
employed by a licensed outfitter solely for the following activities: car-
ing for, grooming or saddling of livestock, cooking, woodcutting, and trans-


porting people, equipment and personal property on public roads shall be ex-
empt from the provisions of this chapter.
(d) "Board" means the Idaho outfitters and guides licensing board.
(e) "License year" means that period of time beginning on April 1 and
expiring March 31 the following year.
(f) "Individual" means any person other than a partnership, corpora-
tion or any other organization or combination thereof.
(g) "Allocated tag" means a hunting tag that has been allocated by the
fish and game commission pursuant to section 36-408(4),Idaho Code.
(h) "Capped hunt" means a game management area, unit, or zone for which
the fish and game commission has limited or "capped" the number of deer or elk
tags available for use in a general season hunt.
(i) "Controlled hunt" means a hunt for a species that has a framework
determined by the fish and game commission and that has a limited number of
tags that are distributed by random drawing to hunters.
(j) "Outfitted hunter tag use history" means the number of tags used by
clients of an outfitter for the hunt or hunts with the most similar framework
to the hunt for which the allocated tag is being designated.
(k) "Remaining allocated tag" means an allocated tag in an existing
capped or controlled hunt that would have been designated to a particular
outfitting operation had the outfitting operation used all of its previously
designated allocated tags in the preceding big game season or seasons and
that will be designated pursuant to this chapter.
(l) "Base allocation" means the historic tag use of an outfitting oper-
ation over the preceding two (2) years in a given hunt as computed in section
36-2120(2), Idaho Code.
(m) "Pool" means a group of tags that have not been utilized or have been
surrendered by the outfitting operation to which they were originally desig-
nated and are made available to other operations in the same hunt.
(n) "Utilized" means that a tag has been purchased, exchanged, or con-
verted at the department of fish and game as a designated allocated tag.
(o) (g) "Commission" means the Idaho fish and game commission.
(p) (h) "Compensation" means the receipt, exchange, or taking of goods,
services, or cash in exchange for outfitted or guided activities. A bona
fide charging of out-of-pocket travel expenses by members of a recreational
party is not deemed compensation. However, such out-of-pocket expenses
shall not include depreciation, amortization, wages, or other recompense.
(q) (i) "Facilities and services" or "facilities or services" means the
provision of personnel; lodging, including a tent, home, lodge, or hotel or
motel; transportation, other than by commercial carrier; guiding; prepara-
tion and serving of food and equipment; or any other accommodation for the
benefit of clientele in the conduct of outdoor recreational activities as
designated in subsection (b) of this section.
(r) (j) "Hazardous desert or mountain excursions" means outfitted or
guided activities conducted in a desert or mountainous environment that may
constitute a potential danger to the health, safety, or welfare of partic-
ipants involved and are known to involve inherent risk. These activities
include day or overnight trailrides, backpacking, technical mountaineering
and rock climbing, cross-country skiing, backcountry alpine skiing, animal
pack trips, snowmobiling, operating an all-terrain vehicle, paragliding,


anadromous fishing, chukar hunting, trapping, motored and non-motored cy-
cling, wagon rides, sleigh rides, and dog sled rides.
(s) (k) "Minor amendment" means all outfitter license amendment re-
quests that can be processed by the board without requiring recommendation
of a land managing agency or other agency before the board takes final action
on said amendment request.
(t) (l) "Operating area" means the area assigned by the board to an out-
fitter for the conduct of outfitting activities.
(u) (m) "Out-of-pocket expenses" means the direct expenses attribut-
able to a recreational activity. Such direct expenses do not include compen-
sation for either sponsors or participants, amortization or depreciation of
debt or equipment, or costs of nonexpendable supplies.
SECTION 10. That Section 36-2102, Idaho Code, as amended by Section 55,
Chapter 86, Laws of 2024, be, and the same is hereby amended to read as fol-
lows:
36-2102. DEFINITIONS. (a) "Person" includes any individual, firm,
partnership, corporation or other organization or any combination thereof.
(b) "Outfitter" includes any person who, while engaging in the acts
enumerated herein: (1) advertises or otherwise holds himself out to the
public for hire; (2) provides facilities and services for consideration; and
(3) maintains, leases, or otherwise uses equipment or accommodations for
compensation for the conduct of outdoor recreational activities that are
known to involve inherent risk limited to the following: hunting animals
or birds; float or power boating on Idaho lakes, reservoirs, rivers, and
streams; fishing on Idaho lakes, reservoirs, rivers, and streams; and haz-
ardous desert or mountain excursions. Any firm, partnership, corporation or
other organization or combination thereof operating as an outfitter shall
designate one (1) or more individuals as agents who shall, together with
the licensed outfitter, be held responsible for the conduct of the licensed
outfitter's operations and who shall meet all of the qualifications of a
licensed outfitter.
(c) "Guide" is any natural person who is employed by a licensed outfit-
ter to furnish personal services for the conduct of outdoor recreational ac-
tivities directly related to the conduct of activities for which the employ-
ing outfitter is licensed. Any such person not employed by a licensed out-
fitter who offers or provides facilities or services as specified in subsec-
tion (b) of this section shall be deemed in violation of the provisions of
this chapter, except: (1) any employee of the state of Idaho or the United
States when acting in his official capacity, or (2) any natural person who is
employed by a licensed outfitter solely for the following activities: car-
ing for, grooming or saddling of livestock, cooking, woodcutting, and trans-
porting people, equipment and personal property on public roads shall be ex-
empt from the provisions of this chapter.
(d) "Board" means the Idaho outfitters and guides licensing board.
(e)(i) "Renewal cycle" for outfitters and their designated agents
means that period of time beginning on April 1 and expiring March 31 the
following year for a one (1) year license or March 31 of the subsequent
year for a two (2) year license.


(ii) "Renewal cycle" for a guide shall be on the licensee's birthday. A
guide may renew the guide's license up to twelve (12) weeks prior to the
expiration date.
(f) "Individual" means any person other than a partnership, corpora-
tion or any other organization or combination thereof.
(g) "Allocated tag" means a hunting tag that has been allocated by the
fish and game commission pursuant to section 36-408(4),Idaho Code.
(h) "Capped hunt" means a game management area, unit, or zone for which
the fish and game commission has limited or "capped" the number of deer or elk
tags available for use in a general season hunt.
(i) "Controlled hunt" means a hunt for a species that has a framework
determined by the fish and game commission and that has a limited number of
tags that are distributed by random drawing to hunters.
(j) "Outfitted hunter tag use history" means the number of tags used by
clients of an outfitter for the hunt or hunts with the most similar framework
to the hunt for which the allocated tag is being designated.
(k) "Remaining allocated tag" means an allocated tag in an existing
capped or controlled hunt that would have been designated to a particular
outfitting operation had the outfitting operation used all of its previously
designated allocated tags in the preceding big game season or seasons and
that will be designated pursuant to this chapter.
(l) "Base allocation" means the historic tag use of an outfitting oper-
ation over the preceding two (2) years in a given hunt as computed in section
36-2120(2), Idaho Code.
(m) "Pool" means a group of tags that have not been utilized or have been
surrendered by the outfitting operation to which they were originally desig-
nated and are made available to other operations in the same hunt.
(n) "Utilized" means that a tag has been purchased, exchanged, or con-
verted at the department of fish and game as a designated allocated tag.
(o) (g) "Commission" means the Idaho fish and game commission.
(p) (h) "Compensation" means the receipt, exchange, or taking of goods,
services, or cash in exchange for outfitted or guided activities. A bona
fide charging of out-of-pocket travel expenses by members of a recreational
party is not deemed compensation. However, such out-of-pocket expenses
shall not include depreciation, amortization, wages, or other recompense.
(q) (i) "Facilities and services" or "facilities or services" means the
provision of personnel; lodging, including a tent, home, lodge, or hotel or
motel; transportation, other than by commercial carrier; guiding; prepara-
tion and serving of food and equipment; or any other accommodation for the
benefit of clientele in the conduct of outdoor recreational activities as
designated in subsection (b) of this section.
(r) (j) "Hazardous desert or mountain excursions" means outfitted or
guided activities conducted in a desert or mountainous environment that may
constitute a potential danger to the health, safety, or welfare of partic-
ipants involved and are known to involve inherent risk. These activities
include day or overnight trailrides, backpacking, technical mountaineering
and rock climbing, cross-country skiing, backcountry alpine skiing, animal
pack trips, snowmobiling, operating an all-terrain vehicle, paragliding,
anadromous fishing, chukar hunting, trapping, motored and non-motored cy-
cling, wagon rides, sleigh rides, and dog sled rides.


(s) (k) "Minor amendment" means all outfitter license amendment re-
quests that can be processed by the board without requiring recommendation
of a land managing agency or other agency before the board takes final action
on said amendment request.
(t) (l) "Operating area" means the area assigned by the board to an out-
fitter for the conduct of outfitting activities.
(u) (m) "Out-of-pocket expenses" means the direct expenses attribut-
able to a recreational activity. Such direct expenses do not include compen-
sation for either sponsors or participants, amortization or depreciation of
debt or equipment, or costs of nonexpendable supplies.
SECTION 11. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Sections 1 and 2 of this act shall be in full force and ef-
fect on and after July 1, 2025, Sections 3 through 9 shall be in full force and
effect on and after September 1, 2026, and Section 10 shall be in full force
and effect on and after July 1, 2028.